Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1030 of Title 15, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Consent” means an affirmative, verifiable authorization


executed by an owner of record, including electronic signatures in


compliance with the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act;





Req. No. 2478 Page 1


2. “Objection” means any written or electronic communication


from an owner of record stating that the property shall not be


listed, offered, or made available as a short-term rental;


3. “Owner of record” means any person whose ownership interest


appears on the most recently filed deed or instrument recorded with


the county clerk in the county where the property is located;


4. “Short-term rental” means any lease, license, or agreement


allowing occupancy of a residential property, or a portion of a


residential property, for less than thirty (30) consecutive days in


exchange for compensation; and


5. “Short-term rental platform” means any online marketplace,


website, application, digital service, or other similar platform


that advertises, lists, brokers, or facilitates bookings of short-


term rentals.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1030.1 of Title 15, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No property in which more than one person holds an ownership


interest shall be offered, advertised, listed, or made available as


a short-term rental unless all owners of record have provided


consent. No individual owner, regardless of ownership percentage,


shall unilaterally authorize, post, list, lease, or otherwise permit


short-term rental of jointly owned property without the consent of


all owners on record.

Req. No. 2478 Page 2


B. Prior to activating, publishing, or maintaining any short-


term rental listing, a short-term rental platform shall:


1. Verify the identities of all owners of record through


publicly available county clerk records;


2. Obtain documented consent from each owner of record; and


3. Retain documentation of such consent for at least five (5)


years.


C. Consent shall be obtained by each individual owner of record


and shall be capable of being independently verified by a short-term


rental platform.


D. Upon receipt of an objection from any owner of record, the


platform shall immediately suspend or deactivate the listing. No


listing shall be reactivated unless the platform obtains new consent


from all owners of record.


E. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require county


clerks to conduct verification for the provisions of this act.


F. The Attorney General may promulgate rules necessary to


enforce the provisions of this act.


G. A short-term rental platform that activates, maintains, or


fails to deactivate a listing in violation of this section shall be


subject to civil penalties not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00) per violation, liability for actual damages incurred by


any non-consenting owner of record, or injunctive relief. Each day



Req. No. 2478 Page 3


that a noncompliant listing remains active shall constitute a


separate violation.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2478 CAD 1/13/2026 4:18:51 PM







































Req. No. 2478 Page 4